dev/apertium-urd.urd.dix
    <pardef n="م/ونڈھنا__vblex_caus1">
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھانا</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھانے</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاؤں</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھائیں</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاؤں</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھائیں</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاؤ</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاؤ</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاؤ</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاؤ</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھا</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاؤ</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھا</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاؤ</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاؤ</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھائیے</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھائیں</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھائیے</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھائیں</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاؤ</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھائیے</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھائیں</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھائیے</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھائیں</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھائے</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھائیں</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھائے</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھائیں</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھائے</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھائیں</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھائے</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھائیں</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاتا</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاتے</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاتی</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاتیں</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاتے</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاتے</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاتی</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاتیں</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاتیں</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاتا</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاتے</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاتی</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاتیں</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاتے</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاتے</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاتی</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاتیں</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاتیں</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاتا</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاتے</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاتی</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاتیں</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاتا</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاتے</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نڈھاتی</l><r>ونڈھنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    <e lm="مونڈھنا"><i>م</i><par n="م/ونڈھنا__vblex_caus1"/></e>
